Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2317
Corporation incorporated under Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act; validated.

In all cases when there has been an attempt to incorporate a local political subdivision industrial development corporation under the provisions of the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, and articles of incorporation have been duly recorded and filed containing provisions substantially similar to those for incorporation under the provisions of the Nebraska Industrial Development Corporation Act, the corporation may, with the approval of the governing body of the local political subdivision in which it is located, become validated ab initio as a corporation organized under and governed by the act with respect to any bonds issued and all other matters concerning its affairs and business by executing and filing with the Secretary of State a certificate of its adoption of the act.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 18;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 17;

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 182.

Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, see section 21-1901.